California statutes. Education Code
 and the projections of occupational shortages and skills gap developed by industry leaders. The commission shall publish, and retain, on its internet website a current list of the areas of occupational or technical training that meet the criteria described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f), and update this list as necessary.

(h) Using the best available data, the commission shall examine the graduation rates and job placement data, or salary data, of eligible programs. Commencing with the 2014–15 academic year, the commission shall give priority to Cal Grant C award applicants seeking to enroll in programs that rate high in graduation rates and job placement data, or salary data.

(i) (1) The commission shall consult with the Employment Development Department, the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the California Workforce Development Board, and the local workforce investment boards to develop a plan to publicize the existence of the grant award program to California’s long-term unemployed to be used by those consulting agencies when they come in contact with members of the population who are likely to be experiencing long-term unemployment. The outreach plan shall use existing
 administrative and service delivery processes making use of existing points of contact with the long-term unemployed. The local workforce investment boards are required to participate only to the extent that the outreach efforts are a part of their existing responsibilities under the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998 (Public Law 105-220).

(2) The commission shall consult with the Workforce Services Branch of the Employment Development Department, the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the California Workforce Development
 Board, and the local workforce investment boards to develop a plan to make students receiving awards aware of job search and placement services available through the Employment Development Department and the local workforce investment boards. Outreach shall use existing administrative and service delivery processes making use of existing points of contact with the students. The local workforce investment boards are required to participate only to the extent that the outreach efforts are a part of their existing responsibilities under the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998 (Public Law 105-220).

(j) (1) The Legislative Analyst’s Office shall submit a report to the Legislature on the outcomes of the Cal Grant C program on or before April 1, 2019. This report shall include, but not be limited to, information
 on all of the following:

(A) The age, gender, and segment of attendance for recipients in two prior award years.

(B) The occupational and technical training program categories prioritized.

(C) The number and percentage of students who received selection priority as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f).

(D) The extent to which recipients in these award years were successfully placed in jobs that meet local, regional, or state workforce needs.

(2) For the report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1), the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall include data for two additional prior award years and shall compare the mix of occupational and technical training programs and institutions in which
 Cal Grant C award recipients enrolled before and after implementation of subdivision (f).

(3) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the commission shall submit a report to the Legislature on or before April 1, 2021, and on or before April 1 of each odd-numbered year thereafter, that includes the information specified in paragraph (1).

(4) A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 10.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Cal Grant T Program [69440. - 69440.]

69440.

(a) Commencing with the 2001–02 academic year, and each academic year thereafter, Cal Grant T awards shall be used only for tuition and student fees for a maximum of one academic year of full-time attendance in a program of professional preparation that has been approved by the California Commission on Teacher Credentialing. The maximum award amount, and the total amount of funding, shall be determined each year in the annual Budget Act. As a condition of receiving a Cal Grant T award, a recipient shall teach for one year in a high-priority school, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 44510, for each two thousand dollar ($2,000) incentive provided through the Cal Grant T Program, for a period not to exceed four years. Any recipient who fails to meet his or her teaching obligation shall repay the Cal Grant T award.

(b) The commission shall allocate Cal Grant T awards using academic criteria or criteria related to past performance similar to that used in awarding Cal Grant A awards for the 2000–01 academic year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 573, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Cal Grant Alternative Delivery System Pilot Program [69450. - 69460.]

69450.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this article, to enhance the long-term policy of the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program and the state’s historic commitment, as stated in Section 66021.2, of providing educational opportunity by ensuring all students with financial need with access to, and choice of, an institution of higher education.

(b) It is further the intent of the Legislature that, pursuant to this article, the commission implement a pilot alternative delivery system within the Cal Grant Program that would provide program functions consistent with access to, and choice of, institutions for students with financial need. The pilot alternative delivery system
 should take advantage of, and not impair, the efficiencies of the recent Internet-based improvements to the commission’s Grant Delivery System by allowing qualifying institutions to elect to award Cal Grant awards pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 69434), Article 3 (commencing with Section 69435), and Article 4 (commencing with Section 69436) for students admitted to those institutions, and by ensuring that those qualifying institutions function as a one-stop shop for financial aid information by providing assistance to students, parents, and high school and community college counselors seeking information about the Cal Grant Program and other student financial aid.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that awards and services to students not be disrupted in the implementation of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 644, Sec. 4.   (AB 187)   Effective November 5, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69452.

(a) The commission shall adopt emergency regulations by July 1, 2010, establishing the pilot alternative Cal Grant delivery system to allow a qualifying institution to elect to administer Cal Grant awards under the Cal Grant A Entitlement Program (Article 2 (commencing with Section 69434)), the Cal Grant B Entitlement Program (Article 3 (commencing with Section 69435)), and the California Community College Transfer Cal Grant Entitlement Program (Article 4 (commencing with Section 69436)). The regulations shall be consistent with this article.

(b) The commission shall convene an advisory task force to assist in understanding the technical and data requirements necessary for implementation of the pilot
 program. The task force shall be convened within 15 days of the effective date of this section. The task force shall be composed of commission staff and representatives of institutions interested in participating in the pilot program.

(c) To ensure unobstructed student access to Cal Grant awards, the alternative delivery system shall not impair the commission’s ability to keep track of all students as long as they may be eligible for any Cal Grant awards and other student financial aid administered by the commission. The pilot alternative delivery system shall not impair the commission’s ability to communicate with, and make awards to, students if they are eligible for Cal Grant awards.

(d) To ensure accountability for, and integrity of, state funds, the alternative delivery system shall not impair the commission’s ability to do any of the following:

(1) Pay Cal Grant awards.

(2) Disburse funds to qualifying institutions.

(3) Confirm Cal Grants awarded by qualifying institutions.

(4) Require qualifying institutions to conform Cal Grants they have awarded to the requirements of this chapter.

(5) Require qualifying institutions to provide student and Cal Grant award information to the commission at times deemed necessary by the commission.

(e) The commission may adopt any other requirements that are necessary to ensure that the alternative delivery system provides students with financial need with access to, and choice of, an institution of higher
 education.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 644, Sec. 4.   (AB 187)   Effective November 5, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69453.

The commission shall not implement the pilot alternative delivery system established pursuant to Section 69452 until at least 30, but no more than 35, qualifying institutions have committed to participating in the alternative delivery system and to paying the costs associated with developing and implementing the alternative delivery system. The commission shall not expend any resources on the development and implementation of the pilot alternative delivery system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 644, Sec. 4.   (AB 187)   Effective November 5, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69454.

(a) (1) A qualifying institution electing to participate in the pilot alternative delivery system shall submit an application to the commission acknowledging that the qualifying institution satisfies the requirements for the pilot alternative delivery system and will maintain compliance with those requirements as long as it continues to award Cal Grant awards.

(2) The commission shall review, and may approve, the application if the commission determines that the institution complies with all applicable requirements.

(3) A qualifying institution may not award Cal Grants until the commission has approved its
 application.

(4) The Regents of the University of California, the Board of Trustees of the California State University, and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall select qualifying campuses from within their respective segments to apply for participation in the pilot program. For each segment, not more than 25 percent of the total number of campuses within the respective segment may participate in the pilot program.

(b) In addition to complying with the regulations adopted for participation in the pilot program, a qualifying institution electing to participate in the pilot alternative delivery system shall do all of the following:

(1) Make eligibility determinations consistent with the requirements of the Cal Grant Program and requirements adopted by the commission.

(2) Inform the student of his or her Cal Grant award before the student is required to make an enrollment decision for the following academic year. The award shall be made as part of the qualifying institution’s complete financial aid award so that the student is aware of all the student aid that the he or she is eligible to receive.

(3) Provide notice to the student that he or she may be eligible to use the Cal Grant award at another qualifying institution to which he or she is admitted.

(c) A qualifying institution electing to participate in the pilot alternative delivery system shall report all of the following to the commission in a form, and within the time, determined by the commission to maximize student access to Cal Grant awards:

(1) Information
 necessary to determine Cal Grant funding projections for the State Budget.

(2) Aggregate information on applicants for Cal Grant awards and students who have been awarded Cal Grant awards, by income level, gender, age, and ethnicity.

(3) Aggregate information on students who have been awarded Cal Grant awards, but have withdrawn from their qualifying institutions.

(4) Aggregate information on students who have been awarded Cal Grant awards but for whom awards have not been disbursed.

(5) Information on the total amount of institutional aid available for students at the qualifying institution, the total number of recipients of institutional aid, the total amount of institutional aid provided to recipients of Cal Grant awards at the qualifying
 institution, and the amount of institutional aid awarded to each student receiving a Cal Grant award.

(6) Information on the amount of other financial aid, including, but not necessarily limited to, fee waivers, federal loans, private loans, and work study awarded to each student receiving a Cal Grant award.

(7) Any other information determined by the commission to be necessary to fulfill its responsibilities under the Cal Grant Program.

(d) (1) A qualifying institution electing to participate in the pilot alternative delivery system shall function as a one-stop shop for student financial aid by providing assistance to all students, parents, and high school counselors inquiring or seeking information about Cal Grant awards and other student financial aid, including information about the
 availability of, requirements for, and the amount of, Cal Grant awards that may be available at other qualifying institutions in all segments of postsecondary education. The qualifying institution may also provide comparable information on federal and other student financial aid.

(2) A qualifying institution that does not comply with this subdivision is not eligible to participate in the alternative delivery system pilot program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 644, Sec. 4.   (AB 187)   Effective November 5, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69456.

All costs associated with developing, implementing, maintaining, and improving the pilot alternative delivery system shall be paid by the qualifying institutions that elect to participate in the pilot alternative delivery system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 644, Sec. 4.   (AB 187)   Effective November 5, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69458.

(a) Participation in the pilot alternative delivery system pursuant to this article is voluntary. Any local agency electing to participate in the pilot alternative delivery system is deemed to have acknowledged and agreed that its participation is voluntary and does not constitute a cost that is reimbursable under Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) All costs associated with a qualifying institution’s election to participate in the pilot alternative delivery system shall be paid by the qualifying institution and, if the qualifying institution is a public institution, shall not require any additional state funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 51.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69460.

(a) On or before January 10, 2012, the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall report to the Legislature and the Governor on the implementation and outcomes of the first award cycle under the pilot program. The report shall assess the extent to which the pilot program resulted in improved Cal Grant delivery to students, parents, and high school and financial aid counselors; administrative efficiencies; and sufficient state oversight. The report shall also identify any challenges or barriers to expansion of the alternative Cal Grant delivery system, as well as any associated information technology challenges that may need to be addressed or changes that may be required.

(b) Consistent with the criteria in subdivision (a), the
 Student Aid Commission may provide a report to the Legislature and the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 52.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Awards for Students with Dependent Children [69465. - 69465.]

69465.

(a) For purposes of this article, “dependent child” or “dependent children” means a child or children, as applicable, under 18 years of age whose parent or legal guardian is the student, if the child or all the children collectively receive more than 50 percent of their support from the student.

(b) Commencing with the 2022–23 academic year and each academic year thereafter, the commission shall identify all individuals with a dependent child or dependent children who meet both of the following qualifying criteria for the award year:

(1) The student will receive either a new or renewal Cal Grant A, B, or C award.

(2) The student will attend a University of California campus, California State University campus, California Community College campus, or an independent institution of higher education, as defined in Section 66010.

(c) Individuals identified by the commission as meeting qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (b) and who are receiving a Cal Grant A award or Cal Grant B award shall receive a total annual access award not to exceed six thousand dollars ($6,000). This amount may be adjusted in the annual Budget Act.

(d) Individuals identified by the commission as meeting qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (b) and who are receiving a Cal Grant C award shall receive a total annual book and supply award not to exceed four thousand dollars ($4,000). This amount may be adjusted in the annual Budget Act. Consistent with subdivision (e) of Section 69439, awards issued pursuant to this subdivision may be used for living expenses, institutional fees, charges, and other costs, including tuition and training-related costs, such as special clothing, local transportation, and required tools,
 equipment, supplies, technology, and books.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, expenses paid with access awards granted pursuant to subdivision (c), and book and supply awards granted pursuant to subdivision (d), shall be considered allowable educational expenses and shall not be considered for purposes of determining eligibility for state public assistance programs.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, an award provided pursuant to this article shall be excluded from the calculation of the maximum annual award value for purposes of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 69432.9.

(g) The usage of awards provided pursuant to this article shall be consistent with existing statutes and regulations governing eligible expenditures.

(h) Notwithstanding subdivisions (c) and (d), both of the following shall apply for purposes of this article:

(1) The amount appropriated in the annual Budget Act, and any other appropriation for purposes of this article, shall not exceed two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000).

(2) The commission shall annually determine if the amount appropriated for each fiscal year is sufficient to cover the cumulative cost of the funding projected to be awarded for the fiscal year pursuant to this article. If the commission determines that the amount appropriated is not sufficient to meet the funding projection for a fiscal year, the commission shall reduce awards proportionately by an equal percentage for all new recipients under this article for that fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 15.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Awards for Foster Youth and Former Foster Youth [69470. - 69470.]

69470.

(a) Commencing with the 2022–23 academic year, the commission shall identify all foster youth and former foster youth, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 66025.9, who meet both of the following qualifying criteria for the award year:

(1) The student will receive either a new or renewal Cal Grant A, B, or C award.

(2) The student will attend a University of
 California campus, California State
 University campus,
 California Community College campus, or an independent institution of higher education, as defined in Section 66010.

(b) Individuals identified by the commission as meeting qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (a) and who are receiving a Cal Grant A award or Cal Grant B award shall receive a total annual access award not to exceed six thousand dollars ($6,000). This amount may be adjusted in the annual Budget Act.

(c) Individuals identified by the commission as meeting qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (a) and who are receiving a Cal Grant C award shall receive a total annual book and supply award not to exceed four thousand dollars ($4,000). This amount
 may be adjusted in the annual Budget Act. Consistent with subdivision (e) of Section 69439, awards issued pursuant to this subdivision may be used for living expenses, institutional fees, charges, and other costs, including tuition and training-related costs, such as special clothing, local transportation, and required tools, equipment, supplies, technology, and books.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, expenses paid with access awards granted pursuant to subdivision (b) and book and supply awards granted pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be considered allowable educational expenses and shall not be considered for purposes of determining eligibility for state public assistance programs.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, an award provided pursuant to this article shall be excluded from the calculation of the maximum annual award value for purposes of subparagraph (A) of paragraph
 (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 69432.9.

(f) The usage of awards provided pursuant to this article shall be consistent with existing statutes and regulations governing eligible expenditures.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (c), both of the following shall apply for purposes of this article:

(1) The amount appropriated in the annual Budget Act, and any other appropriation for purposes of this article, shall not exceed forty million dollars ($40,000,000).

(2) The commission shall annually determine if the amount appropriated for each fiscal year is sufficient to cover the cumulative cost of the funding projected to be awarded for the fiscal year pursuant to this article. If the commission determines that the amount appropriated is not
 sufficient to meet the funding projection for a fiscal year, the commission shall reduce awards proportionately by an equal percentage for all new recipients under this article for that fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 16.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Suspension of Chapter Operation [69475. - 69475.]

69475.

This chapter, except for Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 69438), Article 9 (commencing with Section 69465), and Article 10 (commencing with Section 69470), shall become inoperative on July 1, 2024, and as of January 1 of the year following that inoperative date, is repealed, only if General Fund moneys over the multiyear forecasts beginning in the 2024–25 fiscal year are available to support ongoing augmentations and actions, and if funding is provided in the annual Budget Act to implement the Cal Grant Reform Act pursuant to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 69405) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 17.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 65.   Conditionally repealed as prescribed by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal would affect Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) except Articles 5.5, 9, and 10; Section 69431.7 contains its own repeal provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Student Financial Aid Programs [69500. - 70048.]



  ARTICLE 1. Purposes [69500. - 69500.]

69500.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Student assistance programs have the primary purpose of providing equal opportunity and access to postsecondary education for persons of both sexes, and all races, ancestries, incomes, ages, and geographies in California.

(b) Student aid programs should enhance the ability of individuals to choose the most appropriate postsecondary educational opportunity and among different institutions.

(c) Student aid programs should assist students to progress through the educational program in accordance with the individual’s educational objectives.

(d) Student aid programs should provide assistance to individuals who desire to enroll in an independent college or university.

(e) Student aid programs should, furthermore, complement more general statewide goals for public postsecondary education.

(f) State purposes regarding student aid programs should complement the purposes of federal student assistance programs so as to enhance the effectiveness of state programs; the state’s purposes mentioned above serve to enhance the purposes of the Pell Grant Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1079, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. General Provisions [69503. - 69509.6.]

69503.

In enacting this article, the Legislature finds and declares:

(a) The awarding of financial assistance to needy students by state-funded student aid programs appropriately considers family income in determining an applicant’s financial need.

(b) Claiming of financial independence by students whose parents are in fact able to provide financial assistance unfairly redirects limited student aid dollars from students with legitimate financial need.

(c) Definitions and procedures by which a student may declare financial independence from the student’s parents differ among state-funded student aid programs and among institutions. A statutory definition of when a student’s eligibility for need-based, state-funded grants is to be determined without regard to his or her parents’ financial circumstances will reduce confusion and ensure that such grants are allocated to students on the basis of a more equitable evaluation of their financial need.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

69503.6.

Each institution of higher education with a physical presence in this state shall separately list the cost of institutionally
 operated housing and meal plans on all Internet Web sites and documents it provides to students for purposes of advertising or otherwise displaying the student costs associated with institutionally operated housing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 314, Sec. 1.   (AB 1961)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

69504.

The provisions of this article apply to all need-based student grants that are funded by the state or a public postsecondary educational institution. Nothing in this article shall be construed as attempting to regulate the selection or awarding of scholarships to applicants by the state or a public postsecondary educational institution where the scholarships are funded and awarded pursuant to the terms of a private endowment, trust, or similar instrument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1214.)
-------------------------------------------

69504.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, students who are victims of trafficking, domestic violence, and other serious crimes who have been granted a status under Section 1101(a)(15)(T)(i) or (ii), or Section 1101(a)(15)(U)(i) or (ii), of Title 8 of the United States Code shall be eligible to apply for, and participate in, all student financial aid programs and scholarships administered by a public postsecondary educational institution or the State of California to the same extent as individuals who are admitted to the United States as refugees under Section 1157 of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(b) The University of California is requested to adopt policies that are
 consistent with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 509, Sec. 2.   (AB 1899)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

69505.

(a) To the extent that federal financial analysis methodology incorporates this exemption, income received as reparation payments paid pursuant to federal law on or after October 1, 1990, for the purpose of redressing the injustice done to United States citizens and permanent residents of Japanese ancestry who were interned during World War II shall not be considered in determining an applicant’s financial need.

(b) To the extent that federal financial analysis methodology incorporates this exemption, income received as reparation payments paid by the Canadian government for the purpose of redressing the injustice done to persons of Japanese
 ancestry who were interned in Canada during World War II shall not be considered in determining an applicant’s financial need.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 69, Sec. 9.   (AB 1850)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

69505.5.

(a) (1) No campus of the California Community Colleges or the California State University shall enter into a contract on or after January 1, 2014, with any entity, whether a specific depository institution or an entity that partners with one or more depository institutions, that requires a student to open an account with that entity as a condition of the student receiving his or her financial aid disbursement.

(2) Each campus of the University of California is requested to not enter into a contract on or after January 1, 2014, with any entity, whether a specific depository institution or an entity that partners with one or more depository institutions, that requires a student to
 open an account with that entity as a condition of the student receiving his or her financial aid disbursement.

(b) (1) Each campus of the California Community Colleges and the California State University shall offer a student the option of receiving his or her financial aid disbursement via direct deposit into an account at a depository institution of the student’s choosing. Each campus of the California Community Colleges and the California State University shall ensure that its contract or contracts for financial aid disbursement entered into on or after January 1, 2014, provide that the contracting entity shall initiate the direct deposit within one business day of receipt of the financial aid disbursement moneys from each campus of the California Community Colleges and the California State University.

(2) Each campus of the University of California is
 requested to offer a student the option of receiving his or her financial aid disbursement via direct deposit into an account at a depository institution of the student’s choosing. Each campus of the University of California is requested to ensure that its contract or contracts for financial aid disbursement entered into on or after January 1, 2014, provide that the contracting entity shall initiate the direct deposit within one business day of receipt of the financial aid disbursement moneys from each campus of the University of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 217, Sec. 1.   (SB 595)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

69505.8.

(a) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges and the Trustees of the California State University shall, and the Regents of the University of California and each governing body of an accredited private postsecondary educational institution are requested to, develop one or more model contracts for use at their respective systems for the disbursement of a financial aid award, scholarship, campus-based aid award, or school refund onto a debit card, prepaid card, or other preloaded card issued by a financial institution. Each model contract shall be developed in consultation with stakeholders including statewide
 student associations, individual campuses, and financial institutions that issue debit cards, prepaid cards, and preloaded cards and shall not be finalized before public comment is sought and considered.

(b) The board of governors and the trustees shall, and the regents and each governing body of an accredited private postsecondary educational institution are requested to, make every model contract developed under subdivision (a), and every binding contract negotiated by an educational institution under the jurisdiction of one of these governing bodies with a financial institution for the disbursement of a financial aid award, scholarship, campus-based aid award, or school refund onto a debit card,
 prepaid card, or preloaded card, publicly available on its Internet Web site.

(c) Every model contract developed under subdivision (a) shall consider the best interests of students and shall, at a minimum, contain provisions that reflect conditions required for compliance with federal regulations governing the disbursement of federal financial aid.

(d) When developing each model contract, the board of governors and the trustees shall, and the regents and each governing body of an accredited private postsecondary educational institution are requested to, consider all of the following:

(1) The number of on-campus locations and proximity of off-campus locations where a fee-free withdrawal could
 be made by a student using a debit card, prepaid card, or preloaded card.

(2) The type and size of fees a student would incur from debit, prepaid, or preloaded card use and whether provisions of the model contract ensure that the educational institution is provided information by the card-issuing financial institution to evaluate the costs of these fees to students.

(3) The impact, if any, that offering a card displaying the name or mascot of a campus or educational system would have on students, that campus, or that educational system.

(4) Whether provisions of the model contract ensure that the educational institution monitors compliance by the financial institution with federal Title IV requirements governing the disbursement
 of financial aid.

(5) Whether provisions of the model contract ensure a process for the tracking and resolution of student complaints about the card-issuing financial institution’s credit delivery, customer service, and debit, prepaid, or preloaded cards.

(6) The impact, if any, of the content of a dispute resolution clause on students, their campus, and their educational system, if a conflict were to arise between a student and the card-issuing financial institution.

(7) Whether provisions of the model contract ensure that the educational institution does not disclose student information to the card-issuing financial institution beyond
 what is necessary to perform the contracted financial aid award, scholarship, campus-based aid award, or school refund disbursement function.

(8) Whether provisions of the model contract ensure that the card-issuing financial institution does not solicit or collect information from a student that is not necessary to perform the contracted financial aid award, scholarship, campus-based aid award, or school refund disbursement function as a condition of allowing the student
 to access a financial aid award, scholarship, campus-based aid award, or school refund through a debit card, prepaid card, or preloaded card.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 120, Sec. 1.   (SB 845)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

69506.

(a) The methodology set forth in federal law or regulation shall serve as the formula for determining the expected family contribution of students seeking any state-funded financial assistance.

(b) For the purposes of determining the dependent and independent status of students, the definition set forth in the federal law or regulation shall serve as the definition for students seeking any state-funded financial assistance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 620, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

69506.

(a) (1) The methodology set forth in federal law or regulation shall serve as the formula for determining the expected family contribution of students seeking any state-funded financial assistance.

(2) Commencing with the 2024–25 award year, if funding for the Cal Grant Reform Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 69405)) is included in the annual Budget Act, the methodology set forth in federal law or regulation shall serve as the formula for determining the eligibility index for student aid of students seeking
 any state-funded financial assistance.

(b) For purposes of determining the dependent and independent status of students, the definition set forth in the federal law or regulation shall serve as the definition for students seeking any state-funded financial assistance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 18.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 65.)
-------------------------------------------

69506.3.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission, commencing with the 1991–92 academic year, shall implement the income verification process authorized in Section 19286.9 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and develop procedures which allow postsecondary educational institutions to use information obtained through that process.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 620, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

69506.5.
